Tennessee, session 114, SB1803.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The commissioner of commerce and insurance shall use existing
resources to conduct a study of neighboring states' recent innovations in addressing substance
use disorder through new health insurance coverage and reimbursement methods, strategies,
or models. The commissioner shall compile the findings from the study into a report, along with
any legislative recommendations developed from study findings, and transmit the published
report to the chief clerk of the senate, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, and the
legislative librarian no later than December 31, 2026. The publication and transmission of the
report may be by electronic means.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1803
011401
- 1 -